src/egy_lex/negverb.lexc
!!!negverb.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
NegPrefixes;

LEXICON FinalNegSuffix
+ش:^ش #;

LEXICON NegPrefixes
ما+:ما^ NegConjPrefixes;
م+:م^ NegConjPrefixes;
ما+ب+:ماب^ NegConjPrefixes;
م+ب+:مب^ NegConjPrefixes;
ما+ح+:ماح^ NegConjPrefixes;
م+ح+:مح^ NegConjPrefixes;

LEXICON NegConjPrefixes
0:0 NegVerb;
ت:ت^ NegVerb;
ي:ي^ NegVerb;
ن:ن^ NegVerb;

LEXICON NegSuffix
0:0 FinalNegSuffix;
نا+ك:^ناك FinalNegSuffix;
ت+ها:^تها FinalNegSuffix;
نا+ه:^ناه FinalNegSuffix;
تي+نا:^تينا FinalNegSuffix;
تي+ك:^تيك FinalNegSuffix;
و+نا:^ونا FinalNegSuffix;
تو+نا:^تونا FinalNegSuffix;
ها:^ها FinalNegSuffix;
تو+ها:^توها FinalNegSuffix;
نا:^نا FinalNegSuffix;
ت:^ت FinalNegSuffix;
نا+كو:^ناكو FinalNegSuffix;
نا+كى:^ناكى FinalNegSuffix;
ت+كى:^تكى FinalNegSuffix;
ت+كو:^تكو FinalNegSuffix;
تي+ها:^تيها FinalNegSuffix;
تو+نى:^تونى FinalNegSuffix;
نا+نى:^نانى FinalNegSuffix;
و+ه:^وه FinalNegSuffix;
ت+نى:^تنى FinalNegSuffix;
نا+ها:^ناها FinalNegSuffix;
تي+كو:^تيكو FinalNegSuffix;
تو+كى:^توكى FinalNegSuffix;
تو+هم:^توهم FinalNegSuffix;
و:^و FinalNegSuffix;
و+ها:^وها FinalNegSuffix;
ى:^ى FinalNegSuffix;
تي+هم:^تيهم FinalNegSuffix;
ك:^ك FinalNegSuffix;
و+هم:^وهم FinalNegSuffix;
و+كى:^وكى FinalNegSuffix;
كى:^كى FinalNegSuffix;
ك+ى:^كى FinalNegSuffix;
ه:^ه FinalNegSuffix;
كو:^كو FinalNegSuffix;
نا+هم:^ناهم FinalNegSuffix;
توه:^توه FinalNegSuffix;
و+كو:^وكو FinalNegSuffix;
ت+نا:^تنا FinalNegSuffix;
ت+هم:^تهم FinalNegSuffix;
تي+نى:^تينى FinalNegSuffix;
تو:^تو FinalNegSuffix;
يا:^يا FinalNegSuffix;
تى:^تى FinalNegSuffix;
نى:^نى FinalNegSuffix;
تي+ه:^تيه FinalNegSuffix;
هم:^هم FinalNegSuffix;
و+ك:^وك FinalNegSuffix;
ت+ك:^تك FinalNegSuffix;
و+نى:^ونى FinalNegSuffix;
ت+ه:^ته FinalNegSuffix;
